District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.01

Penalties under other laws.

Any civil liability or criminal penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is, in addition to and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative remedy, penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law. This chapter and the penalties prescribed for violations of this chapter shall not supersede but shall supplement all statutes of the District government and the United States government in which similar conduct is prohibited or regulated.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 801, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2071.
1973 Ed., § 6-1643.